Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1967.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CHANGE STARTS WITH COMMUNITY VIOLENCE PREVENTION PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Objectives. new text end new text begin Change Starts With Community must: new text end new text begin (1) develop and implement year-round job training programs for at-risk youth and adults and provide trusted adult mentorship for at-risk Black, Indigenous, and People of Color youth, providing them with the skills needed for gainful employment and career opportunities; and new text end new text begin (2) create on-site job opportunities at Shiloh Cares Food Shelf - Northside Community Safety Resource Center, promoting community engagement and economic development. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Partnership. new text end new text begin Change Starts With Community shall partner with the Cargill Foundation to support at-risk youth educational career exposure field trips and exposing participants to the Change Starts With Community Agrihood garden and preventing further trauma through field trips for youth. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin At-risk youth and adult job program positions. new text end new text begin Change Starts With Community must use grant proceeds to add positions to the program's complement, including but not limited to adult food service workers, youth food service workers, an executive director, operations director, program coordinator, and food shelf manager. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin Beginning in 2025, Change Starts With Community shall report to the commissioner of employment and economic development outlining the use of grant money, program outcomes, and the impact on the targeted population. The report must be submitted no later than six months after the end of each fiscal year. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Change Starts With Community for a violence prevention jobs program. Grant money must be used to establish a comprehensive workforce development initiative, specifically tailored for youth and adults who are Black, Indigenous, and People of Color at-risk, located on site at Shiloh Cares Food Shelf - Northside Community Safety Resource Center in the city of Minneapolis. new text end